Maine, session 132, LD2174.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §489-E, first ¶, as repealed and replaced by PL 2011, c. 359, §4,
is amended to read:
Rules adopted by the department pursuant to this article are routine technical rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A, including rules to establish a permit-by-
rule process in accordance with section 344, subsection 7, except that rules adopted by the
department after January 1, 2010 pursuant to section 484, subsections 1, 3, 4, 4‑A, 5, 6 and
7 are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §574, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Beneficial electrification. "Beneficial electrification" has the same meaning as in
Title 35-A, section 10102, subsection 3-A.
Page 1 - 132LR2930(01)

Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §574, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Renewable or clean energy project. "Renewable or clean energy project" means
any development that uses a 5-megawatt or greater clean resource, as defined in Title 35-A,
section 3210, subsection 2, paragraph A-4, for the purpose of generating electrical power.
"Renewable or clean energy project" includes all energy storage systems, as defined in Title
35-A, section 3481, subsection 6, powerhouses, dams, water conduits, turbines or other in-
stream power devices, generators, associated transmission lines, water impoundments,
roads and other appurtenant works and structures that are part of the development.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §579-A is enacted to read:
§579-A. Renewable energy and associated transmission development and
conservation
1. Short title. This section may be cited as "the Maine Renewable Energy and
Associated Transmission Development and Conservation Act."
2. Policy. The Legislature declares that it is the policy of the State to support and
encourage the development of hydropower, wind power, biomass, solar and other types of
renewable or clean energy projects and the necessary transmission development activities
needed to serve such projects by simplifying and clarifying requirements for permits, while
ensuring reasonable protection of natural resources and the public interest. It is the purpose
of this section to require a single application and permit for the construction of all such
projects, with the permit application process administered by the department.
It further is the policy of the State to encourage the attraction of appropriately sited
renewable or clean energy project development, including any additional transmission and
other energy infrastructure needed to transport such energy to market, consistent with all
state environmental standards; the permitting and siting of renewable or clean energy
projects; and the permitting, siting, financing and construction of energy research and
manufacturing facilities.
3. Prohibition; permit required; exceptions. Beginning March 1, 2027, a person
may not initiate construction, reconstruction or expansion of a renewable or clean energy
project without first obtaining a permit from the department in accordance with this section.
This section does not apply to activities for which, prior to the effective date of this Act, a
permit or permits have been issued.
4. Permit requirements; coordinated review; applications. An application for a
permit for a renewable or clean energy project under this section is governed by this
subsection.
A. An application for a permit for a renewable or clean energy project required by
subsection 3 must be made on forms provided by the commissioner and filed with the
commissioner. Public notice of the filing must be made as required by the board.
B. Within 10 working days of receiving the completed application for a permit for a
renewable or clean energy project, the commissioner shall notify the applicant of the
official date on which the application was accepted. The commissioner shall also notify
the applicant that the department needs to retain one or more expert consultants
necessary to assist in the review of the project’s compliance with the governing
Page 2 - 132LR2930(01)

413 standards and, following that notice, the department shall employ a consultant or
424 consultants at the expense of the applicant.
C. The commissioner shall circulate the application for a permit among the department,
the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, the Department of Inland
Fisheries and Wildlife, the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of
Transportation, the Maine Historic Preservation Commission, the Department of
Energy Resources, the Public Utilities Commission and the municipal officials of each
municipality in which the renewable or clean energy project is located, inviting timely
submission of any comments for consideration by the department, as the sole
coordinating permitting state agency, in its review of the project’s compliance with the
relevant provisions of the Natural Resources Protection Act, the site location of
development laws, chapter 3, subchapter 1, article 6, the protection of agricultural soils
from solar energy development laws, chapter 35, the land use regulation laws in Title
12, chapter 206-A and any of the provisions set forth in subsection 7.
(1) The Department of Energy Resources and the Public Utilities Commission
shall submit written comments to the department under subsection 7, paragraph D.
(2) Each municipality in which the renewable or clean energy project is located
shall file comments regarding the environmental and economic impacts of the
proposed renewable or clean energy project on that municipality within time limits
set by the department so as not to delay the department’s timely issuance of a
decision. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a municipality
may not enact a moratorium that delays local review of the renewable or clean
energy project, enact or enforce a land use ordinance that prohibits siting of the
proposed development or enact a land use ordinance or ordinance provision that
includes standards or criteria more strict than those of state law or that would
frustrate the purpose of any state law.
D. A person intending to file an application for a permit for a renewable or clean
energy project to remove an existing dam or decommission a renewable or clean energy
project shall attend a preapplication meeting with the department and hold a public
informational meeting prior to filing the application. The preapplication meeting and
the public informational meeting must be held in accordance with the department's
rules on the processing of applications.
5. Department decision. Upon receipt of a properly completed application for a
permit for a renewable or clean energy project, the department shall:
A. Approve the permit for the proposed renewable or clean energy project in writing
upon such terms and conditions as are appropriate and reasonable to protect and
preserve the environment and the public's health, safety and general welfare, including
the public interest in replacing fossil fuels, particularly oil, with renewable or clean
energy and cost-effectively achieving the State's emissions reduction goals under
section 576-A through beneficial electrification;
B. Disapprove the permit for the proposed renewable or clean energy project in writing
setting forth the reasons for the disapproval; or
C. Schedule a hearing on the proposed renewable or clean energy project. The hearing
must follow the notice requirements and procedures for an adjudicatory hearing under
Page 3 - 132LR2930(01)

415 Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 4. Within 45 days after the hearing is held, the
426 department shall make findings of facts and issue an order approving or disapproving
437 the permit for the proposed renewable or clean energy project as provided in paragraphs
448 A and B.
6. Time limits for processing applications. Whenever the commissioner receives a
properly completed application for a permit for a proposed renewable or clean energy
project under subsection 5, the department shall make a decision within 105 working days,
except that decisions delegated to the commissioner by the board must be made within 60
working days. Following one extension of up to 25 working days, the commissioner may
waive the time limit requirements of this subsection only at the request of the applicant.
The permit for a proposed renewable or clean energy project is deemed approved if the
department does not notify the applicant of a decision within the applicable review period.
7. Approval criteria. The department shall approve a permit for a proposed
renewable or clean energy project under subsection 5 when it finds that the applicant has
demonstrated that in addition to meeting the criteria in chapter 3, subchapter 1, articles 5-A
and 6, the following criteria have been met:
A. The renewable or clean energy project will result in significant economic benefits
to the public, including, but not limited to, creation of employment opportunities for
workers in the State;
B. For a renewable or clean energy project within the jurisdiction of the Maine Land
Use Planning Commission, the renewable or clean energy project is consistent with
zoning adopted by the commission;
C. The applicant has made reasonable provisions to realize the environmental benefits
of the renewable or clean energy project, if any, and to mitigate its adverse
environmental impacts;
D. The renewable or clean energy project will result in significant renewable or clean
resource energy benefits, including the increase in generating capacity and annual
energy output resulting from the renewable or clean energy project or indirectly from
the associated transmission of the renewable or clean energy project, the amount of
nonrenewable fuels the renewable or clean energy project would wholly or partly
replace and the provision of material benefits to ratepayers in the State, whether in
lower electricity costs, increases in sustainable employment or enhanced reliability of
noncarbon energy generation;
E. For a proposed electricity transmission project, the project will enable the increase
of significant renewable or clean resource energy benefits under paragraph D while
also meeting the other criteria in this subsection; and
F. For a proposed new or reconstructed renewable or clean energy project, there is
reasonable assurance that the renewable or clean energy project will not violate
applicable state water quality standards, including the provisions of section 464,
subsection 4, paragraph F as required for water quality certification under the United
States Water Pollution Control Act, Section 401. This finding is required for any
proposed impoundment and any affected classified water bodies downstream of the
proposed impoundment.
Page 4 - 132LR2930(01)

The department shall make written findings of facts with respect to the nature and
magnitude of the impact of the renewable or clean energy project on the criteria under
paragraphs D and E and a written explanation of the department's use of these criteria in
reaching its decision.
8. Rescission of approved permit. After a permit for a renewable or clean energy
project has been approved by the department, absent a court ruling vacating that approval
or the department determining that the applicant has violated one or more permit conditions
warranting rescission of the permit, the approved permit may not be revoked.
9. Appeal of approved project. A final decision by the commissioner approving a
permit for a proposed renewable or clean energy project may be appealed to the board or
to the Superior Court only by an abutter or an intervenor in the underlying department
proceeding. If the appeal is to the board, the board shall expedite its review of the appeal
and render a final decision on the appeal within 60 working days of the filing of the appeal.
If the appeal is to the Superior Court, the appeal must be advanced on the docket and receive
priority over other cases.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA c. 5, sub-c. 1, art. 1, sub-art. 1-B, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 6. Rulemaking to establish permit-by-rule process for renewable or
clean energy projects. Within 60 days after the effective date of this Act, the Department
of Environmental Protection shall initiate rulemaking to establish, under the site location
of development laws, the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, chapter 3, subchapter 1, article
6, a permit-by-rule process in accordance with Title 38, section 344, subsection 7 for
renewable or clean energy projects. Such rulemaking by the department is routine technical
rulemaking, as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 7. Revisor's review; cross-references. The Revisor of Statutes shall review
the Maine Revised Statutes and include in the inconsistencies, conflicts and errors bill
submitted to the First Regular Session of the 133rd Legislature pursuant to Title 1, section
94 any sections necessary to correct and update any cross-references in the statutes to
provisions of law repealed in this Act.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.